Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.110

Employment or membership in other organizations—Discrimination prohibited—Penalty—Civil cause of action.

No club, society, association, corporation, employer, or organization shall by any constitution, rule, bylaws, resolution, vote or regulation, or otherwise, discriminate against or refuse to hire, employ, or reemploy any member of the organized militia of Washington because of his or her membership in said organized militia. Any person or persons, club, society, association, employer, corporation, or organization, violating or aiding, abetting, or assisting in the violation of any provision of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be fined in any sum not exceeding one hundred dollars and in addition thereto shall forfeit the right to do business for a period of thirty days. Any person who has been discriminated against in violation of this section shall have a civil cause of action for damages.

[ 1991 c 43 s 9; 1989 c 19 s 52; 1943 c 130 s 47; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-47. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 42; 1909 c 134 s 68.]